lt-LT: Žandikaulio pažangos reguliavimas: Virinti ir kandžioti viena padėtis; Individualus odontologo pritaikytas reguliuojamas; Laipsniškas reguliavimas; Mikro reguliavimas (≤1 mm žingsniais); Nereguliuojamas (fiksuotas); Kita
cs: Nastavitelnost předsunutí čelisti: Uvaření a přizpůsobení jedné pozice; Nastavitelné zubařem na míru; Postupné nastavení; Mikro nastavení (kroky ≤ 1 mm); Nenastavitelné (pevné); Jiné
sl-SI: Prilagodljivost napredovanja čeljusti: Kuhanje in grizenje en položaj; Zobozdravniško prilagojeno nastavljivo; Postopno prilagajanje; Mikro prilagajanje (≤1 mm koraki); Nenastavljivo (fiksno); Drugo
ro-RO: Reglarea avansării maxilarului: Fierbere și modelare poziție unică; Personalizat de dentist ajustabil; Ajustare incrementală; Micro-ajustare (pași ≤1 mm); Neajustabil (fix); Altele
pt-BR: Ajustabilidade do avanço mandibular: Ferve e morde posição única; Ajuste personalizado pelo dentista ajustável; Ajuste incremental; Microajuste (passos de ≤1 mm); Não ajustável (fixo); Outro
hr-HR: Prilagodljivost pomaka čeljusti: Kuhanje i grizenje jedan položaj; Prilagođeno od stomatologa podesivo; Postupna prilagodba; Mikro prilagodba (koraci ≤1 mm); Nepodesivo (fiksno); Ostalo
vi: Khả năng điều chỉnh độ tiến hàm: Luộc và cắn vị trí đơn; Nha sĩ điều chỉnh theo yêu cầu; Điều chỉnh từng bước; Điều chỉnh siêu nhỏ (bước ≤1 mm); Không điều chỉnh được (cố định); Khác
zh-TW: 下顎前移可調性: 煮沸咬合單一位置; 牙醫客製可調式; 漸進調整; 微調（≤1毫米間距）; 不可調整（固定式）; 其他
it: Regolabilità dell'avanzamento mandibolare: Bollire e mordere posizione singola; Personalizzato dal dentista regolabile; Regolazione incrementale; Micro-regolazione (passi ≤1 mm); Non regolabile (fisso); Altro
bg-BG: Регулируемост на изместването на челюстта: Сварете и захапете единична позиция; Персонализирано от зъболекар регулируемо; Постепенно регулиране; Микрорегулиране (≤1 mm стъпки); Нерегулируемо (фиксирано); Други
ko: 턱 전진 조정 가능성: 보일 앤 바이트 단일 위치; 치과 맞춤 조절식; 단계별 조절; 미세 조절 (1mm 단위 이하); 조절 불가 (고정식); 기타
fr: Ajustabilité de l’orthèse d’avancée mandibulaire: Thermoformable position unique; Ajustement personnalisé par dentiste; Ajustement progressif; Micro-ajustement (paliers ≤1 mm); Non ajustable (fixe); Autre
de: Einstellbarkeit der Kiefervorverlagerung: Kochen und beißen Einzelposition; Zahnarzt-angepasst verstellbar; Stufenweise Verstellung; Mikro-Verstellung (≤1 mm Schritte); Nicht verstellbar (fest); Sonstiges
fi: Leuan siirron säädettävyys: Keitä ja pure yksiasentoinen; Hammaslääkärin sovittama säädettävä; Asteittainen säätö; Mikrosäätö (≤1 mm:n askelet); Ei säädettävä (kiinteä); Muu
th: การปรับการเลื่อนขากรรไกรล่าง: ต้มและกัดตำแหน่งเดียว; ทันตแพทย์ปรับแต่งได้; การปรับเพิ่มทีละน้อย; การปรับละเอียด (ขั้นละ ≤1 มม.); ปรับไม่ได้ (คงที่); อื่นๆ
nb: Justerbarhet for kjevefremføring: Kok og bit enkelt posisjon; Spesialtilpasset tannlegejustert justerbar; Trinnvis justering; Mikrojustering (≤1 mm trinn); Ikke-justerbar (fast); Annet
el: Ρυθμιζόμενη προώθηση γνάθου: Βράσιμο και δάγκωμα μονής θέσης; Προσαρμοσμένο από οδοντίατρο ρυθμιζόμενο; Σταδιακή ρύθμιση; Μικρο-ρύθμιση (βήματα ≤1 mm); Μη ρυθμιζόμενο (σταθερό); Άλλο
hu: Állkapocs előretolás-állíthatósága: Forrázható-harapható egypozíciós; Egyedi fogorvosi illeszkedésű állítható; Fokozatos állítás; Mikro-állítás (≤1 mm lépések); Nem állítható (fix); Egyéb
zh-CN: 下颌前移可调性: 热塑成型单一位置; 牙医定制可调节; 增量调节; 微调（≤1 毫米步进）; 不可调节（固定）; 其他
pl: Regulacja wysunięcia szczęk: Zagotuj i ugryź pojedyncza pozycja; Indywidualne dopasowanie u dentysty regulowane; Regulacja przyrostowa; Mikroregulacja (kroki ≤1 mm); Nieregulowany (stały); Inne
nl: Verstelbaarheid kaakpositie: Kook-en-bijt enkele positie; Op maat tandarts passend verstelbaar; Incrementele verstelling; Micro-verstelling (≤1 mm stappen); Niet-verstelbaar (vast); Andere
tr: Çene ilerleme ayarlanabilirliği: Kaynat ve ısır tek pozisyon; Özel diş hekimi uyumu ayarlanabilir; Kademeli ayarlama; Mikro ayarlama (≤1 mm adımlar); Ayarlanamaz (sabit); Diğer
sk-SK: Nastaviteľnosť posunu čeľuste: Uvar a zahryź jednopolohový; Na mieru zubárom nastaviteľný; Postupné nastavenie; Mikronastavenie (≤1 mm kroky); Nenastaviteľný (fixný); Iné
ja: 顎前進調整可能性: ボイル＆バイト単一位置; カスタム歯科医フィット調整可能; 段階的調整; マイクロ調整（≤1mm刻み）; 非調整可能（固定）; その他
ru: Регулируемость выдвижения челюсти: Кипяти и кусай одно положение; Индивидуальная подгонка стоматологом регулируемая; Постепенная регулировка; Микрорегулировка (шаги ≤1 мм); Нерегулируемый (фиксированный); Другой
en: Jaw advancement adjustability: Boil-and-bite single position; Custom dentist-fit adjustable; Incremental adjustment; Micro-adjustment (≤1 mm steps); Non-adjustable (fixed); Other
es: Ajustabilidad del avance mandibular: Hervir y morder posición única; Ajuste personalizado por dentista ajustable; Ajuste incremental; Microajuste (pasos de ≤1 mm); No ajustable (fijo); Otros
da: Kæbeforskydningsjustering: Kog-og-bid enkelt position; Specialtilpasset tandlæge justerbar; Trinvis justering; Mikrojustering (≤1 mm trin); Ikke-justerbar (fast); Andet
pt-PT: Ajustabilidade do avanço mandibular: Fervura e moldagem posição única; Ajuste personalizado por dentista ajustável; Ajuste incremental; Microajuste (passos ≤1 mm); Não ajustável (fixo); Outro
sv: Käkframskjutningsjustering: Koka och bita enkel position; Anpassad tandläkaranpassning justerbar; Stegvis justering; Mikrojustering (≤1 mm steg); Ej justerbar (fast); Övrigt